incubator/apertium-as-hi/apertium-as-hi.hi.dix
		<pardef n="ले_vblex">
			<e><p><l>ता<b/>हूँ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ते<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>हूँ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिया</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिया</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिया<b/>था</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिये<b/>थे</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लूँगा</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ंगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>है</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>है</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिया</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिया</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिया<b/>था</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिया<b/>था</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>गा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>गा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ओ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ओ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हो</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हो</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिए</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिए</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिए<b/>थे</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिए<b/>थे</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ओगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ओगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लीजिए</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लीजिए</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>है</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिए</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिए</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिए<b/>थे</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिए<b/>थे</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ता<b/>है</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ते<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>है</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिया</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिए</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिया<b/>था</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिए<b/>थे</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>गा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ंगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ता<b/>है</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ते<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिए</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिए</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिए<b/>थे</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>लिए<b/>थे</l><r>ले<s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="है_vbser">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="vbser"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>			
	</pardefs>

		<e lm="मत कर"><i>मत<b/>कर</i><par n="है_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="चाहिए"><i>चाहिए</i><par n="है_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="ले"><i>ले</i><par n="ले_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="है"><i>है</i><par n="है_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="हुवा"><i>हुवा</i><par n="है_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="होगा"><i>होगा</i><par n="है_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="हो गया"><i>हो<b/>गया</i><par n="है_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="हो जाएगा"><i>हो<b/>जाएगा</i><par n="है_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="हुआ था"><i>हुआ<b/>था</i><par n="है_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="बनूंगा"><i>बनूंगा</i><par n="है_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="पसंद करता हूँ"><i>पसंद<b/>करता<b/>हूँ</i><par n="है_vbser"/></e>
